Utah statutes.
31A-17-404.2.   Credit allowed a foreign ceding insurer.
(1)  A foreign ceding insurer is allowed a credit for reinsurance or reduction
from liability to the extent that credit is allowed by the ceding insurer's
state of domicile if:
(a)  the state of domicile is accredited by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners; or
(b)  credit or reduction from liability would be allowed under this section if
the foreign ceding insurer were domiciled in this state.
(2)  Credit for reinsurance or reduction from liability may be disallowed a
foreign ceding insurer upon a finding by the commissioner that one or more of
the following do not satisfy the credit for reinsurance requirements of this
chapter applicable to a ceding insurer domiciled in this state:
(a)  the condition of the reinsurer; or
(b)  the collateral or other security provided by the reinsurer.
